FULLXIP/parSem/xip/archive/simple.3/esperanto/GRAMMARS/FRENCH/FST/src/AddSubcat.xfst
# ============================================================================
# TYPE:		(x)fst script
# CONTENT:      extract clitics from morphological analyser
# 
# LANGUAGE:     FRENCH
#
# AUTHOR:       J.P.Chanod, A.Schiller
#
# CREATED:      11-Jul-2003 (JPC)
# UPADTED:	31-Jan-2006 (AS)
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:        xfst -s [LEX.fst] -s [SUBCAT.fst] -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================

define subcat

define lex

# clear remaining nets on the stack
clear stack


#
# LETTERS AND CHARS

define Char [
A | B | C | D | E | F | G | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R |
S | T | U | V | Z | a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k | l | m |
n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v | w | x | y | z | %" | %" | %' | %- | %. |
%/ | à | â | ç | è | é | ê | ë | î | ï | ô | ö| ù | û | ü | %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4
| 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 | %@ | %  | %% | %_ | %, | %$ | %# | %& | %* 
] ;


define TVERB "+Verb" ;
define TNOUN "+Noun" ;
define TADJ "+Adj" ;
define TSCONJ "+SConj";

define POSTAGS [
        TVERB | TNOUN | TADJ | TSCONJ
];

define TAG [\Char];

# extracts from subcat lexicon  (separated by POS) #
# format: upper side is lemma + subcat features; lower side is lemma
define VERBsubcat [ subcat .o. $[TVERB] ] .o. [TVERB -> 0] ;
define NOUNsubcat [ subcat .o. $[TNOUN] ] .o. [TNOUN -> 0];
define ADJsubcat [ subcat .o. $[TADJ] ] .o. [TADJ -> 0];
define SCONJsubcat [ subcat .o. $[TSCONJ] ] .o. [TSCONJ -> 0];

# extracts some sublexicons (by POS) from basic morphological lexicon
define VERBlex  [  $[TVERB]  .o. lex ] ;
define NOUNlex  [  $[TNOUN]  .o. lex ] ;
define ADJlex   [  $[TADJ]   .o. lex ] ;
define SCONJlex [  $[TSCONJ] .o. lex ] ;

# extracts from basic morphological lexicon those words that also belong to subcat lexicon (by POS)
define VERBlex2 [  [VERBsubcat.2 TAG* TVERB TAG*] .o. VERBlex ] ;
define NOUNlex2 [  [NOUNsubcat.2 TAG* TNOUN TAG*] .o. NOUNlex ] ;
define ADJlex2 [  [ADJsubcat.2 TAG* TADJ TAG*] .o. ADJlex ] ;
define SCONJlex2 [  [SCONJsubcat.2 TAG* SCONJ TAG*] .o. SCONJlex ] ;

#define sublex [ VERBlex | NOUNlex | ADJlex ] ;

# add subcat features to those words that belong to both morphol. and subcat lexicons (by POS)
define Synlex [
    [ [VERBsubcat [\Char]*]  .o.  VERBlex2 ]  |
    [ [NOUNsubcat [\Char]*]  .o.  NOUNlex2 ]  |
    [ [ADJsubcat [\Char]*]   .o.  ADJlex2  ]  |
    [ [SCONJsubcat [\Char]*] .o.  SCONJlex2] 
];

# find words that are not described in subcat lexicons

read regex [
 [VERBlex   .o. [ ?* -  VERBlex2.2]  ]   |
 [NOUNlex   .o. [ ?* -  NOUNlex2.2]  ]   |
 [ADJlex    .o. [ ?* -  ADJlex2.2]   ]   |
 [SCONJlex  .o. [ ?* -  SCONJlex2.2] ]   |
 [~$[POSTAGS] .o. lex]
];
define NotSynlex ;


read regex Synlex | NotSynlex ;


#modify some entries
define lex;
# add  deSN feature to verb naître
read regex [ %+deSN <-  [..] || .#. n a î t r e   _ TAG ] .o. lex ;

define lex
# replace deSN feature by deSN2: ditransitive construction: e.g. faire
read regex [ %+deSN2 <-  %+deSN || .#. [f a i r e | r é c l a m e r] TAG*   _ ] .o. lex ;
